Wyoming, session 2026, HB0098.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-14-303 by creating a new subsection
(d) is amended to read:
9-14-303. Civil actions permitted, remedies; criminal
offense.
(d) Any person who knowingly violates any provision
of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not
more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0098
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2